es: Estándar de afinación de concierto: La440 (tono de concierto estándar); La442; La444; Otro
sl-SI: Standard komornega tona: A440 (standardna koncertna uglasitev); A442; A444; Drugo
ko: 콘서트 피치 표준: A440(표준 콘서트 피치); A442; A444; 기타
de: Kammertonstandard: A440 (Standard-Kammerton); A442; A444; Sonstige
nb: Standard for konserttone: A440 (standard konsertstemming); A442; A444; Annet
ro-RO: Standardul tonalității concertului: A440 (acordaj standard de concert); A442; A444; Altele
lt-LT: Koncertinio derinimo standartas: A440 (standartinis koncertinis derinimas); A442; A444; Kita
fr: Référence de diapason de concert: A440 (diapason de concert standard); A442; A444; Autre
pt-BR: Padrão de altura tonal de concerto: A440 (afinação de concerto padrão); A442; A444; Outro
nl: Stemtoon standaard: A440 (standaard kamertoon); A442; A444; Overig
en: Concert pitch standard: A440 (standard concert pitch); A442; A444; Other
ja: コンサートピッチ標準: A440 (標準コンサートピッチ); A442; A444; その他
hr-HR: Koncertni standard tonaliteta: A440 (standardna koncertna visina tona); A442; A444; Ostalo
vi: Tiêu chuẩn cao độ hòa nhạc: A440 (chuẩn cao độ hòa nhạc); A442; A444; Khác
sv: Standard för konserttonhöjd: A440 (standard konserttonhöjd); A442; A444; Annan
bg-BG: Стандарт за концертен строй: A440 (стандартен концертен строй); A442; A444; Друг
sk-SK: Norma koncertného ladenia: A440 (štandardné komorné ladenie); A442; A444; Iné
ru: Стандарт концертного строя: A440 (стандартный концертный строй); A442; A444; Другое
pt-PT: Padrão de afinação de concerto: A440 (afinação de concerto padrão); A442; A444; Outro
it: standard di intonazione da concerto: A440 (diapason standard); A442; A444; Altro
tr: Konser perdesi standardı: A440 (standart konser akordu); A442; A444; Diğer
hu: Koncerthangmagasságra vonatkozó szabvány: A440 (normál zenei hang); A442; A444; Egyéb
da: Standard for koncerttonehøjde: A440 (standard kammetone); A442; A444; Anden
zh-CN: 音乐会音高标准: A440（标准音乐会音高）; A442; A444; 其他
th: มาตรฐานระดับเสียงคอนเสิร์ต: A440 (ระดับเสียงมาตรฐาน); A442; A444; อื่นๆ
fi: Konserttivireen standardi: A440 (normaali viritystaso); A442; A444; Muu
cs: Standardní koncertní výška tónu: A440 (standardní komorní ladění); A442; A444; Jiné
pl: Standard stroju koncertowego: A440 (standardowy strój koncertowy); A442; A444; Inne
zh-TW: 音樂會音高標準: A440 (標準音樂會音高); A442; A444; 其他
el: Πρότυπο τονικού ύψους συναυλίας: A440 (τυπικό τονικό ύψος); A442; A444; Άλλο